nb: Korketrekkertilbehør inkludert: Flaskestopper; Skjermbase; Dryppring; Ekstra spiral; Foliekutter; Gavepakke; Bruksanvisning; Erstatningsskrue; Stativ; Vinheller; Annet
it: Accessori del cavatappi inclusi: Tappo per bottiglia; Base espositiva; Anello antigoccia; Spirale extra; Taglia pellicola alluminio; Pacco regalo; Manuale di istruzioni; Vite di ricambio; Supporto; Versatore per vino; Altro
es: Accesorios para sacacorchos incluidos: Tapón para botella; Base para mostrar; Anillo de goteo; Espiral extra; Cortacápsulas; Caja de regalos; Manual de instrucciones; Dispositivo helicoidal de repuesto; Soporte; Vertedor de vino; Otros
pt-PT: Acessórios para saca-rolhas incluídos: Rolhas para garrafas; Base de exibição; Anel de gotejamento; Espiral extra; Cortador de película; Caixa de presentes; Manual de instruções; Saca-rolhas de substituição; Suporte; Servidor de vinho; Outro
sv: Korkskruvtillbehör som ingår: Flaskpropp; Skärmbas; Droppring; Extra spiral; Folieskärare; Presentbox; Bruksanvisning; Ersättningsmask; Stativ; Vinhällare; Övrigt
ro-RO: Accesorii pentru tirbușon incluse: Dop pentru sticlă; Bază de afișare; Inel de picurare; Spirală suplimentară; Aparat de tăiat folie; Cutie cadou; Manual de instrucțiuni; Spirală de schimb; Suport; Dispozitiv de turnat vin; Altele
el: Περιλαμβανόμενα αξεσουάρ τιρμπουσόν: Πώμα φιάλης; Βάση προβολής; Δακτύλιος στάλαξης; Πρόσθετο σπιράλ; Κόφτης μεμβράνης; Κουτί δώρου; Εγχειρίδιο οδηγιών; Ανταλλακτικό σπιράλ; Βάση; Στόμιο σερβιρίσματος κρασιού; Άλλο
cs: Zahrnuté příslušenství vývrtky: Zátka; Podstavec; Odkapávací kroužek; Vývrtka navíc; Ořezávač fólie; Dárková krabice; Návod k použití; Náhradní vývrtka; Stojan; Nálevka na víno; Jiné
hu: Dugóhúzó tartozékok mellékelve: Palackdugó; Tartóállvány; Cseppfogó gyűrű; Extra spirál; Fóliavágó; Ajándékdoboz; Használati utasítás; Cserespirál; Állvány; Borkiöntő; Egyéb
zh-TW: 包含開瓶器配件: 瓶塞; 展示座; 防滴環; 額外螺紋; 鋁箔切割機; 禮物盒; 說明手冊; 替換螺旋鑽; 立架; 倒酒器; 其他
ko: 코르크스크루 포함 액세서리: 병마개; 디스플레이 베이스; 드립 링; 교체용 스파이럴; 호일 커터; 선물 상자; 사용 설명서; 교체용 웜; 스탠드; 와인 푸어러; 기타
fr: Accessoires inclus avec le tire-bouchon: Bouchon à vin; Socle de présentation; Anneau anti-goutte; Spirale de rechange; Coupe-feuilles; Boîte cadeau; Manuel d’instructions; Mèche de remplacement; Support; Verseur de vin; Autre
sl-SI: Priloženi dodatki za odpirač za steklenice: Zamašek za steklenice; Osnova zaslona; Kapalni obroč; Dodatna spirala; Rezalnik ovojne folije; Darilna škatla; Navodila za uporabo; Nadomestni črv; Stojalo; Točilec vina; Druga
vi: Các phụ kiện đi kèm của đồ khui nút chai: Nút chai; Đế trưng bày; Vòng chắn nước nhỏ giọt; Vòng xoắn dự phòng; Máy cắt giấy bạc; Hộp quà; Hướng dẫn sử dụng; Đầu xoắn thay thế; Giá đỡ; Vòi rót rượu vang; Khác
ja: コルク栓抜きの付属アクセサリー: ワインキャップ; ディスプレイベース; ドリップリング; 追加スパイラル; ホイルカッター; ギフトボックス; 取扱説明書; 交換用ワーム; スタンド; ワイン注ぎ口; その他
bg-BG: Включени аксесоари за тирбушон: Запушалка за бутилка; Основа за показване; Пръстен против капки; Допълнителна спирала; Резачка за фолио; Кутия за подаръци; Ръководство за употреба; Резервна спирала; Стойка; Дозатор за вино; Друго
en: Corkscrew accessories included: Bottle stopper; Display base; Drip ring; Extra spiral; Foil cutter; Gift box; Instruction manual; Replacement worm; Stand; Wine pourer; Other
pt-BR: Acessórios para saca-rolhas incluídos: Tampa para garrafa; Base de exibição; Anel de gotejamento; Espiral extra; Cortador de alumínio; Caixa de presente; Manual de instruções; Parafuso de reposição; Suporte; Servidor de vinho; Outro
hr-HR: Uključen pribor za vadičep: Čep za bocu; Postolje za izlaganje; Prsten protiv kapanja; Dodatna spirala; Rezač folije; Poklon-kutija; Upute za uporabu; Zamjenska spirala; Stalak; Ljevak za točenje vina; Ostalo
pl: Akcesoria do korkociągów w zestawie: Korek do butelki; Podstawa ekspozycyjna; Pierścień ociekowy; Dodatkowa spirala; Obcinak do folii; Opakowanie prezentowe; Instrukcja obsługi; Wymienny spiralny świder; Stojak; Nalewak do wina; Pozostałe
zh-CN: 包含的开瓶器配件: 瓶塞; 展示底座; 防滴环; 备用螺旋钻; 锡箔切割器; 礼物盒; 使用说明书; 替换蜗杆; 支架; 倒酒器; 其他
tr: Ürüne dahil olan tirbuşon aksesuarları: Şişe tıpası; Stand tabanı; Damlatma halkası; Ekstra tirbuşon spirali; Folyo kesici; Hediye kutusu; Kullanım kılavuzu; Yedek tirbuşon spirali; Stant; Şarap akıtıcı; Diğer
ru: Комплектация штопора: Пробка для бутылки; Подставка для демонстрации; Капельное кольцо; Дополнительная спираль; Резак для фольги; Подарочная коробка; Инструкция по эксплуатации; Сменный винт; Подставка; Дозатор для вина; Другое
nl: Inbegrepen kurkentrekkeraccessoires: Flessenstop; Displaybasis; Druppelring; Extra spiraal; Foliesnijder; Cadeaubox; Gebruiksaanwijzing; Vervangingsworm; Standaard; Wijnschenker; Overig
de: Im Lieferumfang enthaltenes Korkenzieherzubehör: Flaschenverschluss; Weinkorkenhalter; Tropfring; Zusätzliche Spirale; Folienschneider; Geschenkbox; Bedienungsanleitung; Ersatzspirale; Ständer; Weinausgießer; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Súčasťou balenia je príslušenstvo s vývrtkou: Zátka na fľašu; Vystavovací stojan; Odkvapkávací krúžok; Náhradná špirála; Rezačka fólie; Darčeková škatuľa; Návod na použitie; Náhradná špirála; Stojan; Nalievač na víno; Iné
th: อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับที่เปิดขวดไวน์ที่รวมอยู่ในชุด: จุกปิดขวด; แบบฐานตั้งแสดง; วงแหวนกันหยด; เกลียวสำรอง; ที่ตัดฟอยล์; กล่องของขวัญ; คู่มือการใช้งาน; แกนเกลียวอะไหล่; แท่นวาง; ที่รินไวน์; อื่นๆ
da: Proptrækkertilbehør medfølger: Flaskeprop; Skærmbase; Drypring; Ekstra spiral; Folieskærer; Gaveæske; Brugsanvisning; Udskiftningsorm; Stativ; Vinskænker; Andet
lt-LT: Kamščiatraukio komplekte esantys priedai: Įkišamas butelių kamštis; Ekrano pagrindas; Lašelinis žiedas; Papildoma spiralė; Folijos pjoviklis; Dovanų dėžutė; Naudojimo instrukcija; Pakaitinis kirminas; Stovas; Vyno pilstytojas; Kita
fi: Korkkiruuvitarvikkeet sisältyvät hintaan: Pullon korkki; Näyttöalunen; Tipparengas; Lisäruuvi; Folioleikkuri; Lahjapaketti; Käyttöohje; Vaihtokierre; Jalusta; Viininkaadin; Muu